test/src/morphology/N-uushka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ūška: # Noun 47 'eng /est rästik/fin' - full paradigm
     ūška+N+Sg+Nom: ūška
     ūška+N+Sg+Gen: ūška
     ūška+N+Sg+Par: uiskõ
     ūška+N+Sg+Dat: ūškan
     ūška+N+Sg+Ins: ūškaks
     ūška+N+Sg+Ill: uiskõ
     ūška+N+Sg+Ela: ūškast
     ūška+N+Pl+Nom: ūškad
     ūška+N+Pl+Gen: ūškad
     ūška+N+Pl+Par: ūškidi
     ūška+N+Pl+Dat: ūškadõn
     ūška+N+Pl+Ins: ūškadõks
     ūška+N+Pl+Ill: ūškiz
     ūška+N+Pl+Ela: ūškist
